Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.510.260

Distribution by ESD superintendent.

Upon receiving the certificate of apportionment from the superintendent of public instruction the educational service district superintendent shall promptly apportion to the school districts of his or her educational service district the amounts then due and apportionable to such districts as certified by the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 1990 c 33 s 427; 1983 c 56 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 68; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 109; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.48.030. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 162 s 2; 1945 c 141 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4940-8. Formerly RCW 28A.48.030, 28.48.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.